Tennessee, session 114, SB0830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-103(a), is amended by
redesignating the subsection as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following new subdivision:
(2) A person commits an offense under subdivision (a)(1) who recklessly
discharges a firearm into the air while in a densely populated area. As used in this
subdivision (a)(2), "densely populated area" may be proven by evidence of the
population of the city or county, housing density in the immediate area of the offense, the
number of persons present at the time of the offense, or any other evidence.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0830
002763
- 1 -